app/utils/MuseScoreWindows/tables/da-dk-g28.ctb
noback pass2 @f-245 @2457
noback pass2 @f-56-245 @56-2457
noback pass2 @f-5-245 @5-2457
nofor pass2 @2457 @f-245
nofor pass2 @5-2457 @f-5-245

noback pass2 @f-13 @137
noback pass2 @f-56-13 @56-137
noback pass2 @f-5-13 @5-137
nofor pass2 @137 @f-13
nofor pass2 @5-137 @f-5-13
nofor pass2 @458-137 @f-458-13

noback pass2 @f-123 @1237
noback pass2 @f-56-123 @56-1237
noback pass2 @f-5-123 @5-1237
nofor pass2 @1237 @f-123
nofor pass2 @5-1237 @f-5-123
nofor pass2 @458-1237 @f-458-123

noback pass2 @f-134 @1347
noback pass2 @f-56-134 @56-1347
noback pass2 @f-5-134 @5-1347
nofor pass2 @1347 @f-134
nofor pass2 @5-1347 @f-5-134
nofor pass2 @458-1347 @f-458-134

noback pass2 @f-1345 @13457
noback pass2 @f-56-1345 @56-13457
noback pass2 @f-5-1345 @5-13457
nofor pass2 @13457 @f-1345
nofor pass2 @5-13457 @f-5-1345
nofor pass2 @458-13457 @f-458-1345

noback pass2 @f-135 @1357
noback pass2 @f-56-135 @56-1357
noback pass2 @f-5-135 @5-1357
nofor pass2 @1357 @f-135
nofor pass2 @5-1357 @f-5-135
nofor pass2 @458-1357 @f-458-135
nofor pass2 @458-5-1357 @f-458-5-135

noback pass2 @f-1234 @12347
noback pass2 @f-56-1234 @56-12347
noback pass2 @f-5-1234 @5-12347
nofor pass2 @12347 @f-1234
nofor pass2 @5-12347 @f-5-1234
nofor pass2 @458-12347 @f-458-1234

noback pass2 @f-12345 @123457
noback pass2 @f-56-12345 @56-123457
noback pass2 @f-5-12345 @5-123457
nofor pass2 @123457 @f-12345
nofor pass2 @5-123457 @f-5-12345

noback pass2 @f-1235 @12357
noback pass2 @f-56-1235 @56-12357
noback pass2 @f-5-1235 @5-12357
nofor pass2 @12357 @f-1235
nofor pass2 @5-12357 @f-5-1235
nofor pass2 @458-12357 @f-458-1235

noback pass2 @f-234 @2347
noback pass2 @f-56-234 @56-2347
noback pass2 @f-5-234 @5-2347
nofor pass2 @2347 @f-234
nofor pass2 @5-2347 @f-5-234
nofor pass2 @458-2347 @f-458-234

noback pass2 @f-2345 @23457
noback pass2 @f-56-2345 @56-23457
noback pass2 @f-5-2345 @5-23457
nofor pass2 @23457 @f-2345
nofor pass2 @5-23457 @f-5-2345
nofor pass2 @458-23457 @f-458-2345

noback pass2 @f-136 @1367
noback pass2 @f-56-136 @56-1367
noback pass2 @f-5-136 @5-1367
nofor pass2 @1367 @f-136
nofor pass2 @5-1367 @f-5-136
nofor pass2 @458-1367 @f-458-136
nofor pass2 @458-5-1367 @f-458-5-136

noback pass2 @f-1236 @12367
noback pass2 @f-56-1236 @56-12367
noback pass2 @f-5-1236 @5-12367
nofor pass2 @12367 @f-1236
nofor pass2 @5-12367 @f-5-1236

noback pass2 @f-2456 @24567
noback pass2 @f-56-2456 @56-24567
noback pass2 @f-5-2456 @5-24567
nofor pass2 @24567 @f-2456
nofor pass2 @5-24567 @f-5-2456
nofor pass2 @458-24567 @f-458-2456
nofor pass2 @458-5-24567 @f-458-5-2456

noback pass2 @f-1346 @13467
noback pass2 @f-56-1346 @56-13467
noback pass2 @f-5-1346 @5-13467
nofor pass2 @13467 @f-1346
nofor pass2 @5-13467 @f-5-1346
nofor pass2 @458-13467 @f-458-1346

noback pass2 @f-13456 @134567
noback pass2 @f-56-13456 @56-134567
noback pass2 @f-5-13456 @5-134567
nofor pass2 @134567 @f-13456
nofor pass2 @5-134567 @f-5-13456
nofor pass2 @458-134567 @f-458-13456

noback pass2 @f-1356 @13567
noback pass2 @f-56-1356 @56-13567
noback pass2 @f-5-1356 @5-13567
nofor pass2 @13567 @f-1356
nofor pass2 @5-13567 @f-5-1356
nofor pass2 @458-13567 @f-458-1356

noback pass2 @f-34 @347
noback pass2 @f-56-34 @56-347
noback pass2 @f-5-34 @5-347
nofor pass2 @347 @f-34
nofor pass2 @5-347 @f-5-34

noback pass2 @f-346 @3467
noback pass2 @f-56-346 @56-3467
noback pass2 @f-5-346 @5-3467
nofor pass2 @3467 @f-346
nofor pass2 @5-3467 @f-5-346

#noback pass2 @f-2348 @23478
#noback pass2 @f-56-2348 @56-23478
#noback pass2 @f-5-2348 @5-23478
#nofor pass2 @23478 @f-2348
#nofor pass2 @5-23478 @f-5-2348

noback pass2 @f-1358 @13578
noback pass2 @f-56-1358 @56-13578
noback pass2 @f-5-1358 @5-13578
nofor pass2 @13578 @f-1358
nofor pass2 @5-13578 @f-5-1358

noback pass2 @f-234568 @2345678
noback pass2 @f-56-234568 @56-2345678
noback pass2 @f-5-234568 @5-2345678
nofor pass2 @2345678 @f-234568
nofor pass2 @5-2345678 @f-5-234568

noback pass2 @f-236 @2367
noback pass2 @f-56-236 @56-2367
noback pass2 @f-5-236 @5-2367
nofor pass2 @2367 @f-236
nofor pass2 @5-2367 @f-5-236

noback pass2 @f-256 @2567
noback pass2 @f-56-256 @56-2567
noback pass2 @f-5-256 @5-2567
nofor pass2 @2567 @f-256
nofor pass2 @5-2567 @f-5-256

noback pass2 @f-356 @3567
noback pass2 @f-56-356 @56-3567
noback pass2 @f-5-356 @5-3567
nofor pass2 @3567 @f-356
nofor pass2 @5-3567 @f-5-356

noback pass2 @f-3456 @34567
noback pass2 @f-56-3456 @56-34567
noback pass2 @f-5-3456 @5-34567
nofor pass2 @34567 @f-3456
nofor pass2 @5-34567 @f-5-3456

noback pass2 @f-12356 @123567
noback pass2 @f-56-12356 @56-123567
noback pass2 @f-5-12356 @5-123567
nofor pass2 @123567 @f-12356
nofor pass2 @5-123567 @f-5-12356

noback pass2 @f-123568 @1235678
noback pass2 @f-56-123568 @56-1235678
noback pass2 @f-5-123568 @5-1235678
nofor pass2 @1235678 @f-123568
nofor pass2 @5-1235678 @f-5-123568

noback pass2 @f-168 @1678
noback pass2 @f-56-168 @56-1678
noback pass2 @f-5-168 @5-1678
nofor pass2 @1678 @f-168
nofor pass2 @5-1678 @f-5-168

noback pass2 @f-1468 @14678
noback pass2 @f-56-1468 @56-14678
noback pass2 @f-5-1468 @5-14678
nofor pass2 @14678 @f-1468
nofor pass2 @5-14678 @f-5-1468

noback pass2 @f-3458 @34578
noback pass2 @f-56-3458 @56-34578
noback pass2 @f-5-3458 @5-34578
nofor pass2 @34578 @f-3458
nofor pass2 @5-34578 @f-5-3458

noback pass2 @f-16 @167
noback pass2 @f-56-16 @56-167
noback pass2 @f-5-16 @5-167
nofor pass2 @167 @f-16
nofor pass2 @5-167 @f-5-16

noback pass2 @f-345 @3457
noback pass2 @f-56-345 @56-3457
noback pass2 @f-5-345 @5-3457
nofor pass2 @3457 @f-345
nofor pass2 @5-3457 @f-5-345

noback pass2 @f-12346 @123467
noback pass2 @f-56-12346 @56-123467
noback pass2 @f-5-12346 @5-123467
nofor pass2 @123467 @f-12346
nofor pass2 @5-123467 @f-5-12346
nofor pass2 @458-123467 @f-458-12346

noback pass2 @f-2346 @23467
noback pass2 @f-56-2346 @56-23467
noback pass2 @f-5-2346 @5-23467
nofor pass2 @23467 @f-2346
nofor pass2 @5-23467 @f-5-2346

noback pass2 @f-123456 @1234567
noback pass2 @f-56-123456 @56-1234567
noback pass2 @f-5-123456 @5-1234567
nofor pass2 @1234567 @f-123456
nofor pass2 @5-1234567 @f-5-123456

noback pass2 @f-126 @1267
noback pass2 @f-56-126 @56-1267
noback pass2 @f-5-126 @5-1267
nofor pass2 @1267 @f-126
nofor pass2 @5-1267 @f-5-126

noback pass2 @f-1246 @12467
noback pass2 @f-56-1246 @56-12467
noback pass2 @f-5-1246 @5-12467
nofor pass2 @12467 @f-1246
nofor pass2 @5-12467 @f-5-1246

noback pass2 @f-1568 @15678
noback pass2 @f-56-1568 @56-15678
noback pass2 @f-5-1568 @5-15678
nofor pass2 @15678 @f-1568
nofor pass2 @5-15678 @f-5-1568

noback pass2 @f-1268 @12678
noback pass2 @f-56-1268 @56-12678
noback pass2 @f-5-1268 @5-12678
nofor pass2 @12678 @f-1268
nofor pass2 @5-12678 @f-5-1268

noback pass2 @f-146 @1467
noback pass2 @f-56-146 @56-1467
noback pass2 @f-5-146 @5-1467
nofor pass2 @1467 @f-146
nofor pass2 @5-1467 @f-5-146

noback pass2 @f-12456 @124567
noback pass2 @f-56-12456 @56-124567
noback pass2 @f-5-12456 @5-124567
nofor pass2 @124567 @f-12456
nofor pass2 @5-124567 @f-5-12456

# Eth (does not follow the normal rules)
noback pass2 @f-134568 @67
noback pass2 @f-56-134568 @56-67
nofor pass2 @67 @f-134568

noback pass2 @f-124568 @1245678
noback pass2 @f-56-124568 @56-1245678
noback pass2 @f-5-124568 @5-1245678
nofor pass2 @1245678 @f-124568
nofor pass2 @5-1245678 @f-5-124568

noback pass2 @f-12468 @124678
noback pass2 @f-56-12468 @56-124678
noback pass2 @f-5-12468 @5-124678
nofor pass2 @124678 @f-12468
nofor pass2 @5-124678 @f-5-12468

noback pass2 @f-3468 @34678
noback pass2 @f-56-3468 @56-34678
noback pass2 @f-5-3468 @5-34678
nofor pass2 @34678 @f-3468
nofor pass2 @5-34678 @f-5-3468

noback pass2 @f-1456 @14567
noback pass2 @f-56-1456 @56-14567
noback pass2 @f-5-1456 @5-14567
nofor pass2 @14567 @f-1456
nofor pass2 @5-14567 @f-5-1456
nofor pass2 @458-14567 @f-458-1456

noback pass2 @f-14568 @145678
noback pass2 @f-56-14568 @56-145678
noback pass2 @f-5-14568 @5-145678
nofor pass2 @145678 @f-14568
nofor pass2 @5-145678 @f-5-14568

noback pass2 @f-2468 @24678
noback pass2 @f-56-2468 @56-24678
noback pass2 @f-5-2468 @5-24678
nofor pass2 @24678 @f-2468
nofor pass2 @5-24678 @f-5-2468

noback pass2 @f-246 @2467
noback pass2 @f-56-246 @56-2467
noback pass2 @f-5-246 @5-2467
nofor pass2 @2467 @f-246
nofor pass2 @5-2467 @f-5-246

noback pass2 @f-23456 @234567
noback pass2 @f-56-23456 @56-234567
noback pass2 @f-5-23456 @5-234567
nofor pass2 @234567 @f-23456
nofor pass2 @5-234567 @f-5-23456

noback pass2 @f-12568 @125678
noback pass2 @f-56-12568 @56-125678
noback pass2 @f-5-12568 @5-125678
nofor pass2 @125678 @f-12568
nofor pass2 @5-125678 @f-5-12568

noback pass2 @f-156 @1567
noback pass2 @f-56-156 @56-1567
noback pass2 @f-5-156 @5-1567
nofor pass2 @1567 @f-156
nofor pass2 @5-1567 @f-5-156
nofor pass2 @458-1567 @f-458-156
nofor pass2 @458-5-1567 @f-458-5-156

noback pass2 @f-1256 @12567
noback pass2 @f-56-1256 @56-12567
noback pass2 @f-5-1256 @5-12567
nofor pass2 @12567 @f-1256
nofor pass2 @5-12567 @f-5-1256

noback pass2 @f-1348 @13478
noback pass2 @f-56-1348 @56-13478
noback pass2 @f-5-1348 @5-13478
nofor pass2 @13478 @f-1348
nofor pass2 @5-13478 @f-5-1348

noback pass2 @f-138 @1378
noback pass2 @f-56-138 @56-1378
noback pass2 @f-5-138 @5-1378
nofor pass2 @1378 @f-138
nofor pass2 @5-1378 @f-5-138

noback pass2 @f-234568 @2345678
noback pass2 @f-56-234568 @56-2345678
noback pass2 @f-5-234568 @5-2345678
nofor pass2 @2345678 @f-234568
nofor pass2 @5-2345678 @f-5-234568

# Tweak to keep letsign for letters that should always have letsign.
# Letsign will be removed by the multind opcode. So we insert an extra one.
nofor pass2 @56-123457 @f-56-56-12345
nofor pass2 @56-24567 @f-56-56-2456
nofor pass2 @56-13467 @f-56-56-1346
nofor pass2 @56-13567 @f-56-56-1356
nofor pass2 @56-123567 @f-56-56-12356
nofor pass2 @56-123467 @f-56-56-12346
nofor pass2 @56-23467 @f-56-56-2346
nofor pass2 @56-1234567 @f-56-56-123456
nofor pass2 @56-1267 @f-56-56-126
nofor pass2 @56-12467 @f-56-56-1246
nofor pass2 @56-1467 @f-56-56-146
nofor pass2 @56-124567 @f-56-56-12456
nofor pass2 @56-14567 @f-56-56-1456
nofor pass2 @56-234567 @f-56-56-23456
nofor pass2 @56-1567 @f-56-56-156
nofor pass2 @56-12567 @f-56-56-1256
nofor pass2 @56-3467 @f-56-56-346

# Ensure that punctuation signs etc. are not "tolowered" when they have a letsign, but only when they act as a partword contraction.
nofor pass2 @56-347 *
nofor pass2 @56-2357 *
nofor pass2 @56-2567 *
nofor pass2 @56-2367 *
nofor pass2 @56-34567 *
nofor pass2 @56-367 *

# remove any superfluous capsletter marks.
noback pass2 @f ?

# Pass 3

# Remove any superfluous letsigns and only keep one.
noback pass3 @56-56 @56

# Ensure there is only one emphasis sign
# Danish Braille only has one emphasis sign,
# so don't repeat if more than one emphasis type is present.
noback pass3 @46-46 @46
noback pass3 @46-46-46 @46

# Remove letsigns before letters marked with indicator for accents or greek letters.

noback pass3 @56-5 @5
noback pass3 @56-458 @458

# Remove letsigns from www
noback pass3 @56-2456-56-2456-56-2456 @2456-2456-2456
noback pass3 @56-24567-56-2456-56-2456 @24567-2456-2456
noback pass3 @56-24567-56-24567-56-24567 @24567-24567-24567

# Include hyphenation file as the last thing
include da-dk-g2.dic
